src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/NI_O_bagwaaniigin_gt-norm.yaml
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoonsishinaanidiging
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoonsishinaanidigag
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gibagwaaniiginoonyishinaanibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonyishinaanibaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonyishinaanibaniig
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gibagwaaniiginoonyishinaanidigan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonyishinaanidiging
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonyishinaanidigag
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: gibagwaaniiginoonyishiwaabaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonyishiwaabaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonyishiwaabaniig
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gibagwaaniiginoonyishiwaadigan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonyishiwaadiging
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonyishiwaadigag
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gibagwaaniiginoonsishinaanibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonsishinaanibaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonsishinaanibaniig
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gibagwaaniiginoonsishinaanidigan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonsishinaanidiging
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonsishinaanidigag
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: gibagwaaniiginoonsishiwaabaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonsishiwaabaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonsishiwaabaniig
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gibagwaaniiginoonsishiwaadigan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonsishiwaadiging
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonsishiwaadigag
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: obagwaaniiginoonyishiniibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonyishiniibaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonyishiniibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: obagwaaniiginoonyishiniidigan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonyishiniidiging
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonyishiniidigan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: obagwaaniiginoonyishiwaabaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonyishiwaabaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonyishiwaabaniig
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: obagwaaniiginoonyishiwaadigan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonyishiwaadiging
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonyishiwaadigag
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: obagwaaniiginoonsishiniibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonsishiniibaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonsishiniibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: obagwaaniiginoonsishiniidigan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonsishiniidiging
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonsishiniidigan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: obagwaaniiginoonsishiwaabaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonsishiwaabaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonsishiwaabaniig
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: obagwaaniiginoonsishiwaadigan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonsishiwaadiging
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonsishiwaadigag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nibagwaaniiginomishinaanibaniin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nibagwaaniiginomishinaanibaniing
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nibagwaaniiginomishinaanibaniig
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: nibagwaaniiginomishinaanidigan
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: nibagwaaniiginomishinaanidiging
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: nibagwaaniiginomishinaanidigag
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gibagwaaniiginomishinaanibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gibagwaaniiginomishinaanibaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gibagwaaniiginomishinaanibaniig
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gibagwaaniiginomishinaanidigan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gibagwaaniiginomishinaanidiging
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gibagwaaniiginomishinaanidigag
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: gibagwaaniiginomishiwaabaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: gibagwaaniiginomishiwaabaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: gibagwaaniiginomishiwaabaniig
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gibagwaaniiginomishiwaadigan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gibagwaaniiginomishiwaadiging
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gibagwaaniiginomishiwaadigag
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: obagwaaniiginomishiniibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: obagwaaniiginomishiniibaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: obagwaaniiginomishiniibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: obagwaaniiginomishiniidigan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: obagwaaniiginomishiniidiging
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: obagwaaniiginomishiniidigan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: obagwaaniiginomishiwaabaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: obagwaaniiginomishiwaabaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: obagwaaniiginomishiwaabaniig
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: obagwaaniiginomishiwaadigan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: obagwaaniiginomishiwaadiging
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: obagwaaniiginomishiwaadigag
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanibaniin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanibaniing
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanibaniig
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: nibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanidigan
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanidiging
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanidigag
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanibaniin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanibaniing
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanibaniig
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: nibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanidigan
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanidiging
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanidigag
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanibaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanibaniig
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanidigan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanidiging
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaanidigag
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: gibagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaabaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaabaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaabaniig
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gibagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaadigan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaadiging
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaadigag
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanibaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanibaniig
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanidigan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanidiging
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaanidigag
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: gibagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaabaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaabaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaabaniig
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gibagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaadigan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaadiging
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaadigag
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: obagwaaniiginoonyimishiniibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonyimishiniibaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonyimishiniibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: obagwaaniiginoonyimishiniidigan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonyimishiniidiging
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonyimishiniidigan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: obagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaabaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaabaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaabaniig
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: obagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaadigan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaadiging
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaadigag
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: obagwaaniiginoonsimishiniibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonsimishiniibaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonsimishiniibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: obagwaaniiginoonsimishiniidigan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonsimishiniidiging
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonsimishiniidigan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: obagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaabaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaabaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaabaniig
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: obagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaadigan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaadiging
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonsimishiwaadigag
     
